Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5234
Case characteristics, defined.

Case characteristics shall mean demographic or other objective characteristics of a small employer that are considered by the small employer carrier in the determination of premium rates for the small employer. Claim experience, health status, and duration of coverage shall not be case characteristics for purposes of the Small Employer Health Insurance Availability Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 12.